Utah statutes.
16-6a-1410.   Grounds for administrative dissolution.
The division may commence a proceeding under Section 16-6a-1411 for
administrative dissolution of a nonprofit corporation if:
(1)  the nonprofit corporation does not pay when they are due any taxes, fees,
or penalties imposed by this chapter or other applicable laws of this state;
(2)  the nonprofit corporation does not deliver its annual report to the
division when it is due;
(3)  the nonprofit corporation is without a registered agent; or
(4)  the nonprofit corporation does not give notice to the division that:
(a)  its registered agent has been changed;
(b)  its registered agent has resigned; or
(c)  the nonprofit corporation's period of duration stated in its articles of
incorporation expires.
